Utah statutes.
78B-3-203.   Sworn certificate of nonresident doing business here.
(1)  Any nonresident person, other than insurance organizations, doing
business in this state in one or more places shall file a sworn certificate
with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code.
(2)  The certificate shall contain the name and address of the manager,
superintendent, or agent in this state upon whom service of process may be had
in any action arising out of the conduct of the business.
